Florida, session 2026, HB985.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
24
25 Section 1. Subsection (6) of section 97.053, Florida
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb985-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 985 2026
26 Statutes, is amended to read:
27 97.053 Acceptance of voter registration applications.—
28 (6)(a) A voter registration application, including an
29 application with a change in name, address, driver license
30 number, or party affiliation, may be accepted as valid only
31 after the department has verified the authenticity or
32 nonexistence of the driver license number, the Florida
33 identification card number, or the last four digits of the
34 social security number provided by the applicant.
35 1. If the applicant completes a voter registration
36 application using a driver license number or Florida
37 identification card number, the supervisor of elections shall
38 verify that the driver license number or Florida identification
39 card number is classified as that of a United States citizen in
40 the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles records. If
41 the applicant is not classified as a United States citizen in
42 such records, the applicant shall provide proof of citizenship.
43 2. If the applicant completes a voter registration
44 application using a the last four digits of his or her social
45 security number, the supervisor shall verify the applicant's
46 citizenship status using the Systematic Alien Verification for
47 Entitlements Program established by the United States Bureau of
48 Citizenship and Immigration Services. If the applicant's
49 citizenship status cannot be verified, the applicant shall
50 provide proof of citizenship.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb985-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 985 2026
51 3. If the supervisor of elections determines that false
52 affirmations have been made on a voter registration application,
53 the matter must be referred to the Office of Election Crimes and
54 Security.
55 (b) If a completed voter registration application has been
56 received by the book-closing deadline but the driver license
57 number, the Florida identification card number, or the last four
58 digits of the social security number provided by the applicant
59 cannot be verified, the applicant shall be notified that the
60 number cannot be verified and that the applicant must provide
61 evidence to the supervisor sufficient to verify the authenticity
62 of the applicant's driver license number, Florida identification
63 card number, or last four digits of the social security number.
64 If the applicant provides the necessary evidence, the supervisor
65 shall place the applicant's name on the registration rolls as an
66 active voter. If the applicant has not provided the necessary
67 evidence or the number has not otherwise been verified prior to
68 the applicant presenting himself or herself to vote, the
69 applicant shall be provided a provisional ballot. The
70 provisional ballot shall be counted only if the number is
71 verified by the end of the canvassing period or if the applicant
72 presents evidence to the supervisor of elections sufficient to
73 verify the authenticity of the applicant's driver license
74 number, Florida identification card number, or last four digits
75 of the social security number no later than 5 p.m. of the second
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb985-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 985 2026
76 day following the election.
77 Section 2. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of
78 section 98.045, Florida Statutes, to read:
79 98.045 Administration of voter registration.—
80 (2) REMOVAL OF REGISTERED VOTERS.—
81 (c) Information received from the Department of Highway
82 Safety and Motor Vehicles indicating that a registered voter in
83 the state has obtained a driver license in another state shall
84 be considered a written request from the voter to have his or
85 her name removed from the statewide voter registration system.
86 Section 3. Subsection (2) of section 101.043, Florida
87 Statutes, is amended to read:
88 101.043 Identification required at polls.—
89 (1)(a) The precinct register, as prescribed in s. 98.461,
90 shall be used at the polls for the purpose of identifying the
91 elector at the polls before allowing him or her to vote. The
92 clerk or inspector shall require each elector, upon entering the
93 polling place, to present one of the following current and valid
94 picture identifications:
95 1. Florida driver license.
96 2. Florida identification card issued by the Department of
97 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles.
98 3. United States passport.
99 4. Debit or credit card.
100 5. Military identification.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb985-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 985 2026
101 6. Student identification.
102 7. Retirement center identification.
103 8. Neighborhood association identification.
104 6.9. Public assistance identification.
105 7.10. Veteran health identification card issued by the
106 United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
107 8.11. A license to carry a concealed weapon or firearm
108 issued pursuant to s. 790.06.
109 9.12. Employee identification card issued by any branch,
110 department, agency, or entity of the Federal Government, the
111 state, a county, or a municipality.
112
113 If an elector used a Florida identification card in his or her
114 voter registration application, he or she must present his or
115 her Florida identification card upon entering the polling place.
116 (b) If the picture identification does not contain the
117 signature of the elector, an additional identification that
118 provides the elector's signature shall be required. The address
119 appearing on the identification presented by the elector may not
120 be used as the basis to challenge an elector's legal residence.
121 The elector shall sign his or her name in the space provided on
122 the precinct register or on an electronic device provided for
123 recording the elector's signature. The clerk or inspector shall
124 compare the signature with that on the identification provided
125 by the elector and enter his or her initials in the space
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb985-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 985 2026
126 provided on the precinct register or on an electronic device
127 provided for that purpose and allow the elector to vote if the
128 clerk or inspector is satisfied as to the identity of the
129 elector.
130 (2) If the elector fails to furnish the required
131 identification or if the identification provided denotes the
132 elector as a noncitizen pursuant to s. 322.141(5), the elector
133 shall be allowed to vote a provisional ballot. The canvassing
134 board shall determine the validity of the ballot pursuant to s.
135 101.048(2).
136 Section 4. Paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) of
137 section 101.62, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as paragraphs
138 (d) and (e), respectively, and a new paragraph (c) is added to
139 that subsection, to read:
140 101.62 Request for vote-by-mail ballots.—
141 (1) REQUEST.—
142 (c) Upon receiving a request for a vote-by-mail ballot, if
143 the voter is registered using a Florida identification card, the
144 supervisor of elections shall verify with the Department of
145 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles that:
146 1. The registration and mailing address are complete and
147 current. If the address is not complete or current, the voter
148 must update his or her registration address or vote in person.
149 2. The voter is a United States citizen. If the voter's
150 citizenship status cannot be verified, he or she must provide
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb985-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 985 2026
151 proof of citizenship before voting or being issued an absentee
152 ballot.
153 3. The voter's Florida identification card is not
154 classified as surrendered because he or she obtained an
155 identification card in a new state.
156 Section 5. Subsection (5) is added to section 322.141,
157 Florida Statutes, to read:
158 322.141 Color or markings of certain licenses or
159 identification cards.—
160 (5) All licenses for the operation of motor vehicles or
161 identification cards originally issued or reissued by the
162 department to persons who are not citizens of the United States
163 shall have on the front of the license or identification card
164 "NC" to denote that such person is a noncitizen. For the
165 purposes of this section, submission of any of the following
166 documents is considered proof that such person is a noncitizen:
167 (a) Documents listed in s. 322.08(2)(c)5., 7., or 8.
168 (b) Documents listed in s. 322.051(1)(a)3.e., g., or h.
169 (c) A Type 2 or Type 3 social security card.
170 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb985-00